Massachusetts, session 194th, H2385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special commission established to develop strategies, policies and
recommendations to mitigate the risks of avian influenza also known as H5N1 in the
commonwealth. The commission shall seek to (i) assess the risks and impacts of avian influenza
H5N1 in the commonwealth; (ii) develop and recommend policies for prevention, control and
response to avian influenza H5N1 in the commonwealth; and (iii) coordinating efforts among
government agencies, agricultural stakeholders and public health entities in the commonwealth
to avian influenza H5N1.
(b) The commission shall consist of 15 members that shall include: (i) the secretary of
health and human services or the secretary's designee, who shall serve as chair; (ii) the
of 4

commissioner of the department of public health or their designee; (iii) the commissioner of the
department of agricultural resources or their designee; (iv) the director of the division of fisheries
and wildlife or their designee; (v) the director of the Massachusetts emergency management
agency or their designee; (vi) 2 members appointed by the Massachusetts Veterinary Medical
Association, 1 of whom shall be a veterinarian specializing in avian health appointed and 1 of
whom shall be a veterinarian specializing in dairy health; (vii) 2 members appointed by the
commissioner of the department of agricultural resources, 1 of whom shall be a poultry farmer or
a representative from the Massachusetts poultry industry and 1 of whom shall be a dairy farmer
or a representative from the Massachusetts dairy industry; (viii) 2 members appointed by the
governor, 1 one of whom shall be an academic expert in virology and 1 of whom shall be an
academic expert in zoonotic diseases; (ix) the director of the Massachusetts Bureau of Infectious
Disease and Laboratory Sciences or the director’s designee; (x) 2 members appointed by the
Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc. that shall be local health officials, 1 of whom shall be
an official working in an urban area and 1 of whom shall be an official working in a rural
community, defined as municipalities with population densities of less than 500 persons per
square mile or a population of less than 7,000 persons, in each case as shown in the most recent
U.S. decennial census; and (xi) 1 member appointed by the secretary of health and human
services that shall be an advocate for vulnerable populations.
(c) The work of the commission shall include, but not be limited to: (i) studying the
prevalence and risk factors associated with H5N1 in the commonwealth; (ii) developing
surveillance programs to detect and track outbreaks of H5N1 in wildlife, poultry, dairy cattle and
humans; (iii) recommending policies for biosecurity measures in agricultural settings; (iv)
proposing guidelines for wildlife management to prevent disease spread; (v) developing
of 4

emergency response plans for outbreaks, including quarantine measures, vaccination strategies
and public education campaigns; (vi) raising awareness about the risks of H5N1 and promote
preventive practices among farmers, wildlife sanctuary managers, health professionals and the
public; (vii) facilitate communication and collaboration among federal, state and local agencies,
as well as private stakeholders.
(d) The commission shall have the authority to: (i) request data and support from state
agencies as needed; and (ii) engage external consultants or experts as necessary.
(e) The commission shall do research and provide recommendations for the report
pursuant to subsection (f) on the following subjects: (i) shoring up of stockpiles of the full range
antiviral drugs capable of targeting H5N1, beyond Tamiflu, to guard against viruses mutating
around one medication while staying susceptible to another; (ii) building up a more complete
therapeutic arsenal to serve as a strategic hedge against H5N1’s potentially high-impact threat;
(iii) preparation to launch statewide clinical trials that swiftly evaluate the effectiveness of novel
therapeutic approaches, such as anti-inflammatory or immune-system-modulating drugs, for
patients who might become severely ill or hospitalized; (iv) production of self-administered
swabs that can quickly detect H5N1 and tests to be distributed to farms where animals are raised
and allowing workers to more efficiently screen themselves for the virus; and (v) possible
compensation for ranch owners, farm owners and their workers for any losses stemming from
employee absences when infections are identified.
(f) The commission shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the: (i) secretary of transportation; (ii) chairs
of the joint committee on transportation; (iii) commissioner of the department of public health;
of 4

(iv) chairs of the joint committee on public health; (v) chairs of the house and senate committees
on ways and means; and (vi) offices of the house and senate clerk not later than December 31,
2026.
(g) The commission shall be funded subject to: (i) appropriations and other money
authorized by the general court; and (ii) funds from public and private sources such as gifts,
grants and donations.
(f) The commission’s appointments and first meeting shall take place not later than 60
days after its effective date.
of 4